California, session 20252026, SB277.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 833.6 is added to the Penal Code, to read:(a)A peace officer may search an individual incident to a lawful stop if any of the following are true:(1)The officer has a warrant to search the individual.(2)The officer has statutory authority to conduct a search of the individual.(3)The officer has probable cause to believe that the individual is about to commit a crime, is committing a crime, or has committed a crime immediately preceding the search.(b)(1)If none of the circumstances in subdivision (a) are true, an officer may search an individual only after asking for and obtaining consent to search the individual.(2)An833.6. (a) A peace officer may request consent to search an individual pursuant to paragraph (1) individual, their property, or their effects only if the officer is investigating a crime and has reasonable suspicion that the individual to be searched has an item in their possession that is evidence of criminal activity.(c)(b) (1) An officer requesting consent to search an individual conduct a search pursuant to subdivision (b) (a) shall, prior to before conducting the search, do all of the following in the following order:(1)(A) Advise the individual that their consent is voluntary.(2)(B) Explain to the individual the scope of the search.(3)(C) Receive and record the individual’s consent consistent with the requirements of state law.(2) An officer shall record the actions they performed pursuant to paragraph (1) consistent with the policies of their employing agency.(d)(c) An officer conducting a search of an individual pursuant to subdivision (b) shall do both of the following:(1) Not exceed the scope of the search described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).(2) Discontinue the search if the individual withdraws their consent.(e)(d) (1) This section does not prevent an officer from conducting a search based on an individual’s unsolicited consent provided that the officer does all of the following in the following order: following:(1)(A) Advises the individual that their consent is voluntary.(2)(B) Confirms with the individual the scope of the search.(3)(C) Records the unsolicited consent by the individual.(4)(D) Does not exceed the scope of the search described in paragraph (2). subparagraph (B).(5)(E) Discontinues the search if the individual withdraws their consent.(2) An officer shall record the actions they performed pursuant to paragraph (1) consistent with the policies of their employing agency.(e) An officer may request consent to conduct a search pursuant to this section only if doing so does not violate any applicable state law, local ordinance, or agency policy.(f) This section does not prohibit a local jurisdiction from adopting requirements that are more protective of individuals than those described in this section.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.